Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1192
Department; establish process for
awarding grants; priority.

The department shall establish a competitive process for
awarding grants for bridge programs which meet the requirements of section
79-1191. In awarding such grants, the department shall give priority to:

(1)
Applicants which leverage additional funding through local, philanthropic,
or federal funding, including, but not limited to, participation in the state
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training plan established
pursuant to the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, 7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq.,
funding under the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, 29 U.S.C. 2832
et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2012, funding under the College
Access Challenge Grant Program established pursuant to the federal Higher
Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. 1141, as such section existed on January
1, 2012, funding under the federal Temporary Assistance to Needy Families
program established in 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq., as such sections existed on
January 1, 2012, and funding under the aid to dependent children program;
and

(2) Programs serving recipients of public assistance.

Laws 2012, LB1079, § 4.
June 30, 2015